Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.027

Extension of water and sewer facilities outside city subject to review by boundary review board.

The extension of water or sewer facilities outside of the boundaries of a city or town may be subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

[ 1989 c 84 s 34.]